District of Columbia statutes.
46-354.01

Establishment of support order.

(a)

If a support order entitled to recognition under this chapter has not been issued, a responding tribunal of the District with personal jurisdiction over the parties may issue a support order if:

(1)

The individual seeking the order resides outside the District; or

(2)

The support enforcement agency seeking the order is located outside the District.

(b)

The tribunal may issue a temporary child-support order if the tribunal determines that such an order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is:

(1)

A presumed father of the child;

(2)

Petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

(3)

Identified as the father of the child through genetic testing;

(4)

An alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

(5)

Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child;

(6)

An acknowledged father as provided by §§ 16-909.01 to 16-909.05;

(7)

The mother of the child; or

(8)

An individual who has been ordered to pay child support in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or vacated.

(c)

Upon finding, after notice and opportunity to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders pursuant to § 46-353.05.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 401, 63 DCR 222